Utah statutes.
17-16-6.   County officers -- Time of holding elections -- County commissioners -- Terms of office -- Terms staggered.

(1)  Except as otherwise provided in an optional plan adopted under Chapter 52, Changing Forms of County Government:

(a)  each elected county officer shall be elected at the general election every four years, except as otherwise provided in this title;

(b)  county commissioners shall be elected at the times, in the manner, and for the terms provided in Section 17-52-501; and

(c)  an elected officer shall hold office for the term for which the officer is elected, beginning at noon on the first Monday in January following the officer's election and until a successor is elected or appointed and qualified, except as provided in Section 17-16-1.

(2) (a)  The terms of county officers shall be staggered in accordance with this Subsection (2).

(b)  Except as provided in Subsection (2)(c), in the 2014 general election:

(i)  the following county officers shall be elected to one six-year term and thereafter elected to a four-year term:

(A)  county treasurer;

(B)  county recorder;

(C)  county surveyor; and

(D)  county assessor; and

(ii)  all other county officers shall be elected to a four-year term.

(c)  If a county legislative body consolidates two or more county offices in accordance with Section 17-16-3 on or after May 10, 2011, the county legislative body shall pass an ordinance that sets the election schedule for the consolidated offices in a reasonable manner that staggers the terms of county officers as provided in this Subsection (2).



Amended by Chapter 154, 2011 General Session

